Illinois, session 104th, HB5523.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5adding Section 10.28 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 705/10.28 new)7    Sec. 10.28. Tactical medical providers.8    (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Board and the 9Department of Public Health shall jointly develop and 10establish a program of certification of tactical medical 11providers for the purpose of aiding special law enforcement 12teams involved in search and rescues, civil disturbances, bomb 13threat responses, tactical or special operations team 14deployments, hostage negotiations, hazardous material 15responses, executive and dignitary protection, 16counterterrorism, or other similar functions, as assigned and 17directed by a law enforcement agency that is recognized by the 18Board.19    The Board, in conjunction with the Department of Public 20Health, may establish any fees necessary to fund the training 21and certification requirements of this Section and may 22establish other entities to provide training to meet all or a 23portion of the requirements of this Section.  HB5523- 2 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1    (b) As part of the program of certification of tactical 2medical providers, the Board shall develop or approve a 3tactical medicine for special operators course. The course 4shall be overseen by the EMS Medical Director. A tactical 5medical provider may not work on a special response team until 6the tactical medical provider has completed the tactical 7medicine for special operators course.8    (c) The tactical medical provider program certification 9requirements shall, at a minimum, require an applicant who is 10seeking the certification:11        (1) to be an emergency medical technician, paramedic, 12    physician, physician's assistant, nurse, or other medical 13    professional licensed to practice in the State or to 14    possess a suitable license as determined by the Board and 15    the Department of Public Health;16        (2) to have completed no less than a 40-hour basic 17    firearms certification program recognized by the Board;18        (3) to have completed no less than 50 hours of 19    tactical medical training approved by the Board;20        (4) to have attended no less than 40 hours of tactical 21    and firearms training, including use of force training; 22    and23        (5) to operate within the EMS system in the State that 24    is licensed by the Department of Public Health.25    (d) The Board and the Department of Public Health shall 26establish annual requirements for certification of tactical   HB5523- 3 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1medical providers, including proof that the tactical medical 2provider:3        (1) holds a valid license or certification as a 4    medical professional licensed or certified to practice in 5    the State;6        (2) operates within the EMS system in the State that 7    is licensed by the Department of Public Health;8        (3) completes, on an annual basis, no less than 50 9    hours of tactical medical training;10        (4) completes, on an annual basis, no less than 40 11    hours of tactical and firearms training, including use of 12    force training; and13        (5) satisfies any additional qualifications or 14    licensing, certification, or training standards deemed 15    necessary by the Board and the Department of Public 16    Health. 17    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 183-6012.3 as follows: 19    (55 ILCS 5/3-6012.3 new)20    Sec. 3-6012.3. Tactical medical provider support. A 21sheriff may employ and provide tactical medical provider 22support to first responders with tactical medical providers 23certified under Section 10.28 of the Illinois Police Training 24Act. In addition to any other requirements, the tactical   HB5523- 4 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1medical providers shall participate in routine, ongoing 2tactical and medical training with the first responders that 3the tactical medical providers shall support and shall meet 4any additional training, certification, and licensing 5standards that the sheriff deems appropriate. 6    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 7adding Section 10-4-15 as follows: 8    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-15 new)9    Sec. 10-4-15. Tactical medical provider support. A 10municipality may provide tactical medical provider support to 11first responders with tactical medical providers certified 12under Section 10.28 of the Illinois Police Training Act. In 13addition to any other requirements, the tactical medical 14providers shall participate in routine, ongoing tactical and 15medical training with the first responders that the tactical 16medical providers shall support and shall meet any additional 17training, certification, and licensing standards that the 18chief of police deems appropriate. 19    Section 20. The Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems 20Act is amended by changing Sections 3.5 and 3.50 as follows: 21    (210 ILCS 50/3.5)22    Sec. 3.5. Definitions. As used in this Act:  HB5523- 5 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1    "Clinical observation" means the ongoing observation of a 2patient's medical or mental health condition by a licensed 3health care professional utilizing a medical skill set while 4continuing assessment and care.5    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Public 6Health.7    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois Department 8of Public Health.9    "Emergency" means a medical condition of recent onset and 10severity that would lead a prudent layperson, possessing an 11average knowledge of medicine and health, to believe that 12urgent or unscheduled medical care is required.13    "Emergency Medical Services personnel" or "EMS personnel" 14means persons licensed as an Emergency Medical Responder (EMR) 15(First Responder), Emergency Medical Dispatcher (EMD), 16Emergency Medical Technician (EMT), Emergency Medical 17Technician-Intermediate (EMT-I), Advanced Emergency Medical 18Technician (A-EMT), Paramedic (EMT-P), Emergency 19Communications Registered Nurse (ECRN), Pre-Hospital 20Registered Nurse (PHRN), Pre-Hospital Advanced Practice 21Registered Nurse (PHAPRN), or Pre-Hospital Physician Assistant 22(PHPA), or Tactical Medical Providers (TMP).23    "Exclusive representative" has the same meaning as defined 24in Section 3 of the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 25    "Health care facility" means a hospital, nursing home, 26physician's office or other fixed location at which medical   HB5523- 6 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1and health care services are performed. It does not include 2"pre-hospital emergency care settings" which utilize EMS 3personnel to render pre-hospital emergency care prior to the 4arrival of a transport vehicle, as defined in this Act.5    "Hospital" has the meaning ascribed to that term in the 6Hospital Licensing Act.7    "Labor organization" has the same meaning as defined in 8Section 3 of the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 9    "Medical monitoring" means the performance of medical 10tests and physical exams to evaluate an individual's ongoing 11exposure to a factor that could negatively impact that 12person's health. "Medical monitoring" includes close 13surveillance or supervision of patients liable to suffer 14deterioration in physical or mental health and checks of 15various parameters such as pulse rate, temperature, 16respiration rate, the condition of the pupils, the level of 17consciousness and awareness, the degree of appreciation of 18pain, and blood gas concentrations such as oxygen and carbon 19dioxide.20    "NREMT" means the National Registry of Emergency Medical 21Technicians. 22    "Silver spanner program" means a program in which a member 23under a fire department's or fire protection district's 24collective bargaining agreement works on or at the EMS System 25under another fire department's or fire protection district's 26collective bargaining agreement and (i) the other fire   HB5523- 7 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1department or fire protection district is not the member's 2full-time employer and (ii) any EMS services not included 3under the original fire department's or fire protection 4district's collective bargaining agreement are included in the 5other fire department's or fire protection district's 6collective bargaining agreement. 7    "Trauma" means any significant injury which involves 8single or multiple organ systems.9(Source: P.A. 103-521, eff. 1-1-24; 103-689, eff. 1-1-25; 10104-362, eff. 8-15-25.) 11    (210 ILCS 50/3.50)12    Sec. 3.50. Emergency Medical Services personnel licensure 13levels. 14    (a) "Emergency Medical Technician" or "EMT" means a person 15who has successfully completed a course in basic life support 16as approved by the Department, is currently licensed by the 17Department in accordance with standards prescribed by this Act 18and rules adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act, and 19practices within an EMS System. A valid Emergency Medical 20Technician-Basic (EMT-B) license issued under this Act shall 21continue to be valid and shall be recognized as an Emergency 22Medical Technician (EMT) license until the Emergency Medical 23Technician-Basic (EMT-B) license expires. 24    (b) "Emergency Medical Technician-Intermediate" or "EMT-I" 25means a person who has successfully completed a course in   HB5523- 8 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1intermediate life support as approved by the Department, is 2currently licensed by the Department in accordance with 3standards prescribed by this Act and rules adopted by the 4Department pursuant to this Act, and practices within an 5Intermediate or Advanced Life Support EMS System. 6    (b-5) "Advanced Emergency Medical Technician" or "A-EMT" 7means a person who has successfully completed a course in 8basic and limited advanced emergency medical care as approved 9by the Department, is currently licensed by the Department in 10accordance with standards prescribed by this Act and rules 11adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act, and practices 12within an Intermediate or Advanced Life Support EMS System. 13    (c) "Paramedic (EMT-P)" means a person who has 14successfully completed a course in advanced life support care 15as approved by the Department, is licensed by the Department 16in accordance with standards prescribed by this Act and rules 17adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act, and practices 18within an Advanced Life Support EMS System. A valid Emergency 19Medical Technician-Paramedic (EMT-P) license issued under this 20Act shall continue to be valid and shall be recognized as a 21Paramedic license until the Emergency Medical 22Technician-Paramedic (EMT-P) license expires. 23    (c-3) "Tactical Medical Provider" means a person who has 24successfully completed certification under Section 10.28 of 25the Illinois Police Training Act. 26    (c-5) "Emergency Medical Responder" or "EMR (First   HB5523- 9 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1Responder)" means a person who has successfully completed a 2course in emergency medical response as approved by the 3Department and provides emergency medical response services in 4accordance with the level of care established by the National 5EMS Educational Standards Emergency Medical Responder course 6as modified by the Department, or who provides services as 7part of an EMS System response plan, as approved by the 8Department, of that EMS System. The Department shall have the 9authority to adopt rules governing the curriculum, practice, 10and necessary equipment applicable to Emergency Medical 11Responders.12    On August 15, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 1398-973), a person who is licensed by the Department as a First 14Responder and has completed a Department-approved course in 15first responder defibrillator training based on, or equivalent 16to, the National EMS Educational Standards or other standards 17previously recognized by the Department shall be eligible for 18licensure as an Emergency Medical Responder upon meeting the 19licensure requirements and submitting an application to the 20Department. A valid First Responder license issued under this 21Act shall continue to be valid and shall be recognized as an 22Emergency Medical Responder license until the First Responder 23license expires.24    (c-10) All EMS Systems and licensees shall be fully 25compliant with the National EMS Education Standards, as 26modified by the Department in administrative rules, within 24   HB5523- 10 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1months after the adoption of the administrative rules. 2    (d) The Department shall have the authority and 3responsibility to:4        (1) Prescribe education and training requirements, 5    which includes training in the use of epinephrine, for all 6    levels of EMS personnel except for EMRs, based on the 7    National EMS Educational Standards and any modifications 8    to those curricula specified by the Department through 9    rules adopted pursuant to this Act.10            (A) A failure rate per course of 30% or greater at 11        the first attempt on the licensure examination shall 12        require the EMS System to submit a quality improvement 13        plan to the Department. The EMS System shall share 14        failure rates with the EMS Lead Instructor quarterly. 15        Neither the EMS System nor the Department may take 16        licensure action against an EMS Lead Instructor based 17        solely on first-attempt pass rates.18            (B) Candidates shall complete the licensure 19        examination within the timeline required by the NREMT. 20            (C) An accredited Paramedic program shall be 21        conducted only by an EMS System or an academic 22        institution whose curriculum has been approved by the 23        EMS System. An EMS System associate hospital may allow 24        students from an EMS System-approved and 25        Department-approved Paramedic course to complete 26        clinical rotations as approved by the EMS System   HB5523- 11 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1        Medical Director. The approval by the EMS System 2        Medical Director may not be unreasonably denied.3        (2) Prescribe licensure testing requirements for all 4    levels of EMS personnel, which shall include a requirement 5    that all phases of instruction, training, and field 6    experience be completed before taking the appropriate 7    licensure examination. Candidates shall take the 8    appropriate National Registry examination. In prescribing 9    licensure testing requirements for honorably discharged 10    members of the armed forces of the United States under 11    this paragraph (2), the Department shall ensure that a 12    candidate's military emergency medical training, emergency 13    medical curriculum completed, and clinical experience, as 14    described in paragraph (2.5), are recognized. 15        (2.5) Review applications for EMS personnel licensure 16    from honorably discharged members of the armed forces of 17    the United States with military emergency medical 18    training. Applications shall be filed with the Department 19    within one year after military discharge and shall 20    contain: (i) proof of successful completion of military 21    emergency medical training; (ii) a detailed description of 22    the emergency medical curriculum completed; and (iii) a 23    detailed description of the applicant's clinical 24    experience. The Department may request additional and 25    clarifying information. The Department shall evaluate the 26    application, including the applicant's training and   HB5523- 12 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1    experience, consistent with the standards set forth under 2    subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d) of Section 3.10. If the 3    application clearly demonstrates that the training and 4    experience meet such standards, the Department shall offer 5    the applicant the opportunity to successfully complete a 6    Department-approved EMS personnel examination for the 7    level of license for which the applicant is qualified. 8    Upon passage of an examination, the Department shall issue 9    a license, which shall be subject to all provisions of 10    this Act that are otherwise applicable to the level of EMS 11    personnel license issued. 12        (3) License individuals as an EMR, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, 13    or Paramedic who have met the Department's education, 14    training and examination requirements.15        (4) Prescribe annual continuing education and 16    relicensure requirements for all EMS personnel licensure 17    levels. 18        (5) Relicense individuals as an EMD, EMR, EMT, EMT-I, 19    A-EMT, PHRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, TMP, or Paramedic every 4 20    years, based on their compliance with continuing education 21    and relicensure requirements as required by the Department 22    pursuant to this Act. Every 4 years, a Paramedic shall 23    have 100 hours of approved continuing education, an EMT-I 24    and an advanced EMT shall have 80 hours of approved 25    continuing education, and an EMT shall have 60 hours of 26    approved continuing education. An Illinois licensed EMR,   HB5523- 13 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1    EMD, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, Paramedic, ECRN, PHPA, TMP, 2    PHAPRN, or PHRN whose license has been expired for less 3    than 36 months may apply for reinstatement by the 4    Department. Reinstatement shall require that the applicant 5    (i) submit satisfactory proof of completion of continuing 6    medical education and clinical requirements to be 7    prescribed by the Department in an administrative rule; 8    (ii) submit a positive recommendation from an Illinois EMS 9    Medical Director attesting to the applicant's 10    qualifications for retesting; and (iii) pass a Department 11    approved test for the level of EMS personnel license 12    sought to be reinstated.13        (6) Grant inactive status to any EMR, EMD, EMT, EMT-I, 14    A-EMT, Paramedic, ECRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, TMP, or PHRN who 15    qualifies, based on standards and procedures established 16    by the Department in rules adopted pursuant to this Act.17        (7) Charge a fee for EMS personnel examination, 18    licensure, and license renewal.19        (8) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the 20    license of any licensee, after an opportunity for an 21    impartial hearing before a neutral administrative law 22    judge appointed by the Director, where the preponderance 23    of the evidence shows one or more of the following:24            (A) The licensee has not met continuing education 25        or relicensure requirements as prescribed by the 26        Department;  HB5523- 14 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1            (B) The licensee has failed to maintain 2        proficiency in the level of skills for which he or she 3        is licensed;4            (C) The licensee, during the provision of medical 5        services, engaged in dishonorable, unethical, or 6        unprofessional conduct of a character likely to 7        deceive, defraud, or harm the public;8            (D) The licensee has failed to maintain or has 9        violated standards of performance and conduct as 10        prescribed by the Department in rules adopted pursuant 11        to this Act or his or her EMS System's Program Plan;12            (E) The licensee is physically impaired to the 13        extent that he or she cannot physically perform the 14        skills and functions for which he or she is licensed, 15        as verified by a physician, unless the person is on 16        inactive status pursuant to Department regulations;17            (F) The licensee is mentally impaired to the 18        extent that he or she cannot exercise the appropriate 19        judgment, skill and safety for performing the 20        functions for which he or she is licensed, as verified 21        by a physician, unless the person is on inactive 22        status pursuant to Department regulations;23            (G) The licensee has violated this Act or any rule 24        adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act; or25            (H) The licensee has been convicted (or entered a 26        plea of guilty or nolo contendere) by a court of   HB5523- 15 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1        competent jurisdiction of a Class X, Class 1, or Class 2        2 felony in this State or an out-of-state equivalent 3        offense. 4        (9) Prescribe education and training requirements in 5    the administration and use of opioid antagonists for all 6    levels of EMS personnel based on the National EMS 7    Educational Standards and any modifications to those 8    curricula specified by the Department through rules 9    adopted pursuant to this Act. 10    (d-5) An EMR, EMD, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, Paramedic, ECRN, 11PHAPRN, PHPA, TMP, or PHRN who is a member of the Illinois 12National Guard or an Illinois State Trooper or who exclusively 13serves as a volunteer for units of local government with a 14population base of less than 5,000 or as a volunteer for a 15not-for-profit organization that serves a service area with a 16population base of less than 5,000 may submit an application 17to the Department for a waiver of the fees described under 18paragraph (7) of subsection (d) of this Section on a form 19prescribed by the Department. 20    (d-10) A person who is not an EMS personnel may operate an 21EMS vehicle pursuant to this Act if the following requirements 22are met: (i) the person meets the requirements of Section 2311-1421 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; (ii) 2 24Department-licensed EMS personnel are present and have met 25educational requirements prescribed by the Department; and 26(iii) the clinical condition of the patient necessitates the   HB5523- 16 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1involvement of additional licensed personnel to ensure 2appropriate assessment, treatment, and patient safety. If a 3waiver is issued by the Department, the person who is not an 4EMS personnel may operate the EMS vehicle if only one EMS 5personnel is present. Upon request, the Department may issue a 6retroactive waiver when appropriate. 7    The education requirements prescribed by the Department 8under this Section must allow for the suspension of those 9requirements in the case of a member of the armed services or 10reserve forces of the United States or a member of the Illinois 11National Guard who is on active duty pursuant to an executive 12order of the President of the United States, an act of the 13Congress of the United States, or an order of the Governor at 14the time that the member would otherwise be required to 15fulfill a particular education requirement. Such a person must 16fulfill the education requirement within 6 months after his or 17her release from active duty. 18    (e) In the event that any rule of the Department or an EMS 19Medical Director that requires testing for drug use as a 20condition of the applicable EMS personnel license conflicts 21with or duplicates a provision of a collective bargaining 22agreement that requires testing for drug use, that rule shall 23not apply to any person covered by the collective bargaining 24agreement.25    (f) At the time of applying for or renewing his or her 26license, an applicant for a license or license renewal may   HB5523- 17 -LRB104 20736 RTM 34239 b1submit an email address to the Department. The Department 2shall keep the email address on file as a form of contact for 3the individual. The Department shall send license renewal 4notices electronically and by mail to a licensee who provides 5the Department with his or her email address. The notices 6shall be sent at least 60 days prior to the expiration date of 7the license. 8(Source: P.A. 104-362, eff. 8-15-25.)